Hawaii statutes.
§88-22 System established; name. There
shall be a retirement system for the purpose of providing retirement allowances
and other benefits for employees. It shall have the powers and privileges of a
corporation and shall be known as the "Employees' Retirement System of the
State of Hawaii" and by that name may sue or be sued, transact all of its
business, invest all of its funds, and hold all of its cash and securities and
other property. [L 1925, c 55, §2; am imp L 1927, c 251, §§1, 2, 5; RL 1935,
§7921; am L 1935, c 48, §3; RL 1945, §702; RL 1955, §6-21; HRS §88-22; am L
1969, c 110, pt of §1]

Case Notes

Where no showing that board's failure to authorize and pursue
appeal would precipitate crisis in system's operations or jeopardize system's
corporate existence, system's purported administrator could not initiate appeal
on system's behalf under exception to general rule that only corporation's
board possesses authority to control corporation's litigation. 87 H. 152, 952
P.2d 1215.

Mentioned: 74 H. 181, 840 P.2d 367.

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next